California statutes. Water Code
 notice to, and consultation with, state and federal CALFED representatives and other interested persons and agencies, shall prepare a revised schedule that ensures that balanced solutions in all identified problem areas, including ecosystem restoration, water supply, water quality, and system integrity are achieved, consistent with the intent of the final programmatic EIS/EIR. Funds shall be available for expenditure unless a revised schedule has not been developed within six months from the date on which the secretary determines that the prior schedule has not been substantially adhered to. Upon the preparation of any revised schedule under this subdivision, funds shall be expended in accordance with that revised schedule.

(e) Funds in the subaccount shall become available in accordance with the cost-share agreement developed by the CALFED Bay-Delta Program, which shall describe the federal, state, and local share of funding for the programs,
 projects, and other CALFED stage 1 actions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79200.

On or before December 15 of each year, the Secretary of the Resources Agency shall submit an annual report to the Legislature that describes the status of the implementation of all elements of the CALFED Bay-Delta Program, any determinations made by the secretary pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (d) of Section 79199 and other significant scheduling issues. The report also shall include a detailed accounting of expenditures, descriptions of programs for which expenditures have been made, and a
 schedule of anticipated expenditures for the next year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79201.

The report prepared pursuant to Section 79200 shall include both of the following:

(a) A summary of the results achieved by the projects funded under this article.

(b) An identification of any necessary modifications that should be made to eligible projects or other CALFED bay-delta projects, to ensure that the goals and objectives of CALFED are met.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79201.5.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to address the allocation of benefits from projects or programs funded by this article. It is anticipated that this issue will be settled in the CALFED process or by the Legislature by statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79202.

Not more than 5 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79203.

The department may adopt regulations to carry out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Interim Water Reliable Supply and Water Quality Infrastructure and Management Program [79205.2. - 79205.16.]

79205.2.

(a) “Delta export service area,” as used in this article, means both of the following:

(1) The counties included within the Association of Bay Area Governments.

(2) Those areas of the state outside the delta that receive water from the State Water Project or the Central Valley Project, either directly or by exchange, by means of diversions from
 the delta.

(b) “Local agency,” as used in this article, means any city, county, city and county, district, or other political subdivision of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79205.4.

(a) There is hereby created the Interim Water Supply and Water Quality Infrastructure and Management Subaccount.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the Interim Reliable Water Supply and Water Quality Infrastructure and Management Subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79205.6.

The sum of one hundred eighty million dollars ($180,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79205.8.

(a) The money in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the department, may be used by the department to provide grants or loans, or any combination thereof, which are approved by the Governor, to local agencies located in the delta export service areas for programs or projects that can be completed and provide the intended benefits not later than March 8, 2009, and are designed to increase water supplies, enhance water supply reliability, or improve water
 quality.

(b) The department shall provide grants for programs or projects located outside the delta and which meet one of the following requirements:

(1) The project or program constructs new or expands existing groundwater storage and recovery projects or acquires rights to use storage in existing reservoirs.

(2) The project or program implements measures that facilitate improved water treatment, water transfers, or exchanges, including, but not limited to, a project that improves water quality by shifting reliance from lower quality to higher quality water supplies.

(3) The project or program implements state of the art agricultural water conservation programs, and programs that treat or manage agricultural drainage water for reuse or instream water
 quality benefits.

(c) The department shall list the projects that are proposed to be funded from the subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79205.10.

For purposes of prioritizing eligible programs or projects for funding under this article, the department shall give priority to programs or projects that meet one or more of the following requirements:

(a) Can be completed expeditiously and thereby provide near term benefits and more immediate mitigation of urgent problems related to water supply and water quality.

(b) Implements actions to improve water quality and protect water level conditions in San Luis Reservoir.

(c) Includes public-private partnerships or cost sharing arrangements that maximize public benefits.

(d) Sponsored by a public agency with water supplies that are being or would be impacted to a greater degree by delta-related water supply shortages and water quality degradation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79205.12.

The state, to the greatest extent possible, shall seek matching federal funds to implement this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79205.14.

Funds available from the subaccount shall be available for all phases of project development including, but not limited to, project administration, permitting and environmental compliance, feasibility studies, and construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79205.16.

Not more than 5 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Fiscal Provisions [79210. - 79222.]

79210.

Bonds in the total amount of one billion nine hundred seventy million dollars ($1,970,000,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 79219, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this division and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, shall be and
 constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79211.

(a) The bonds authorized by this division shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except Section 16727, and all of the provisions of that law apply to the bonds and to this division and are hereby incorporated in this division as though set forth in full in this division.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, each state agency that administers an appropriation of the Safe Drinking Water, Clean Water, Watershed Protection, and Flood Protection Bond Fund is designated the “board.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79212.

Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this division, the Safe Drinking Water, Clean Water, Watershed Protection, and Flood Protection Finance Committee is hereby created. For purposes of this division, the Safe Drinking Water, Clean Water, Watershed Protection, and Flood Protection Finance Committee is the “committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law. The committee
 consists of the Treasurer, the Controller, and the Director of Finance, or their designated representatives. A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79213.

The committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this division in order to carry out the actions specified in this division and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79214.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act that is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79215.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this division, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this division, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum necessary to carry out Section 79216, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79216.

For the purposes of carrying out this division, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that have been authorized by the committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this division. Any amount withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, plus an amount equal to the interest that the money would have earned in the Pooled
 Money Investment Account, from proceeds received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79217.

All money deposited in the fund that is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79218.

The agency that administers an appropriation of the Safe Drinking Water, Clean Water, Watershed Protection, and Flood Protection Bond Fund may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purpose of carrying out this division. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the committee, by resolution, has authorized to be sold for the purpose of
 carrying out this division. The requesting agency shall execute any documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the requesting agency in accordance with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79219.

The bonds may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law. Approval by the voters of the state for the issuance of the bonds described in this division includes the approval of the issuance of any other bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued under this division or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79220.

Notwithstanding any provision of this division or the State General Obligation Bond Law, if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this division that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes, subject to designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and for the investment earnings on those proceeds. The Treasurer may use or direct the use of those proceeds
 or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or to take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds required or desirable under federal law to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of that state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79221.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this division are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79222.

Notwithstanding any other law, thirty-four million dollars ($34,000,000) of the unissued bonds authorized for the purposes of Section 79157, and fifty-two million dollars ($52,000,000) of the unissued bonds authorized for the purposes of Section 79195 are reallocated to finance the purposes of, and shall be authorized, issued, and appropriated in accordance with, Division 26.7 (commencing with Section 79700).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 5.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 26.5. WATER SECURITY, CLEAN DRINKING WATER, COASTAL AND BEACH PROTECTION ACT OF 2002 [79500. - 79591.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [79500. - 79509.6.]

79500.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Act of 2002.

(History: Added November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 50.)
-------------------------------------------

79501.

The people of California find and declare that it is necessary and in the public interest to do all of the following:

(a) Secure and safeguard the integrity of the state’s water supply from catastrophic damage or failure from terrorist acts or other deliberate acts of destruction.

(b) Provide a safe, clean, affordable, and sufficient water supply to meet the needs of California residents, farms, and businesses.

(c) Provide adequate financing for balanced implementation of the CALFED Bay-Delta Program to:

(1) Provide good water quality for all beneficial uses. 

(2) Improve and increase aquatic and terrestrial habitats and improve ecological functions in the San Francisco Bay/Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Estuary to support sustainable populations of diverse plant and animal species.

(3) Reduce the mismatch between Bay-Delta water supplies and current and projected beneficial uses dependent on the Bay-Delta system.

(4) Reduce the risk to land uses and associated economic activities, water supply, infrastructure, and ecosystems from catastrophic breaching of Delta levees.

(d) Establish and facilitate integrated regional water management systems and procedures to meet increasing water demands due to significant population growth that is straining local infrastructure and water supplies.

(e) Improve practices within watersheds to improve water quality, reduce pollution, capture additional storm water runoff, protect and manage groundwater better, and increase water use efficiency.

(f) Protect urban communities from drought, increase supplies of clean drinking water, reduce dependence on imported water, reduce pollution of rivers, lakes, streams, and coastal waters, and provide habitat for fish and wildlife.

(g) Invest in projects that further the ability of all Californians to live within California’s basic apportionment of 4.4 million acre-feet per year of Colorado River water pursuant to the Colorado River Water Use Plan.

(h) Protect, restore, and acquire beaches and coastal uplands, wetlands, and watershed lands along the coast and in San Francisco Bay to protect the quality of drinking water, to keep beaches and coastal waters safe from water pollution, and to provide the wildlife and plant habitat and riparian and wetlands areas needed to support functioning coastal and San Francisco Bay ecosystems for the benefit of the people of California.

(History: Added November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 50.)
-------------------------------------------

79502.

It is the intent of the people in enacting this division that it be administered and executed in the most expeditious manner possible, and that all state, regional and local officials implement this division to the fullest extent of their authority.

(History: Added November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 50.)
-------------------------------------------

79503.

It is the intent of the people that water facility projects financed pursuant to this division shall be designed and constructed so as to improve the security and safety of the state’s drinking water system.

(History: Added November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 50.)
-------------------------------------------

79504.

It is the intent of the people that investment of public funds pursuant to this division should result in public benefits.

(History: Added November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 50.)
-------------------------------------------

79505.

As used in this division, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Acquisition” means the acquisition of a fee interest or any other interest, including easements, leases, and development rights.

(b) “Board” means the State Water Resources Control Board. 

(c) “CALFED” means the consortium of state and federal agencies with management and regulatory responsibilities in the San Francisco Bay/Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Estuary.

(d) “CALFED Bay-Delta Program” means the undertaking by CALFED to develop and implement, by means of the final programmatic environmental impact statement/environmental impact report, the preferred programs, actions, projects, and related activities that will provide solutions to identified problem areas related to the San Francisco Bay/Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Estuary ecosystem, including but not limited to the Bay-Delta and its tributary watersheds.

(e) “Department” means the Department of Water Resources. 

(f) “Fund” means the Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Fund of 2002 created pursuant to Section 79510. 

(g) “Nonprofit organization” means any nonprofit corporation formed pursuant to the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code) and qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code. 

(h) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Resources Agency. 

(i) “Wetlands” means lands that may be covered periodically or permanently with shallow water and include saltwater marshes, freshwater marshes, open or closed brackish water marshes, swamps, mudflats, fens, and vernal pools.

(History: Added November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 50.)
-------------------------------------------

79505.5.

As used in this division, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Disadvantaged community” means a community with an annual median household income that is less than 80 percent of the statewide annual median household income.

(b) “Matching funds” means funds made available by nonstate sources, which may include, but are not limited to, donated services from nonstate sources.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), matching funds for a state agency may include state funds and services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 97.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

79505.6.

(a) (1) By March 15, 2004, each state agency disbursing grants or loans pursuant to this division shall develop project solicitation and evaluation guidelines. The guidelines may include a limitation on the size of grants or loans to be awarded.

(2) Prior to disbursing grants, each state agency shall conduct two public meetings to consider public comments prior to finalizing the guidelines. Each state agency shall publish the draft solicitation and evaluation guidelines on its Internet Web site at least 30 days before the public meetings. One meeting shall be conducted at a location in northern California and one meeting shall be conducted at a location in southern California. Upon adoption, each state agency shall transmit copies of the guidelines to the fiscal committees and the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. To the extent feasible, each state agency shall provide outreach to disadvantaged communities to promote access and participation in those meetings.

(3) (A) Subject to subparagraph (B), the guidelines may include a requirement for matching funds.

(B) A state agency may not require matching funds for the purposes of awarding a grant financed by this division to assist a disadvantaged community, except as follows:

(i) For the purposes of awarding a grant pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 79545, the department shall impose matching fund requirements in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 79545.

(ii) For the purposes of awarding a grant subject to Section 79564, the board shall impose matching fund requirements in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 79564.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a state agency, in lieu of adopting guidelines pursuant to subdivision (a), may use guidelines existing on January 1, 2004, to the extent those guidelines conform to the applicable requirements of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 240, Sec. 27.   Effective August 13, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

79506.

Every proposed activity to be financed pursuant to this division shall be in compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 50.)
-------------------------------------------

79506.7.

State agencies that are authorized to award loans or grants financed by this division shall provide technical assistance with regard to the preparation of the applications for those loans or grants in a manner that, among other things, addresses the needs of economically disadvantaged communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 240, Sec. 28.   Effective August 13, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

79507.

Watershed protection activities financed pursuant to this division shall be consistent with the applicable adopted local watershed management plan and the applicable regional water quality control plan adopted by the regional water quality control board.

(History: Added November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 50.)
-------------------------------------------

79508.

Watershed protection activities in the San Gabriel and Los Angeles River watersheds shall be consistent with the San Gabriel and Los Angeles River Watershed and Open Space Plan as adopted by the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy and the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this plan shall be implemented pursuant to Division 23 (commencing with Section 33000) of the Public Resources Code in the watershed of the Los Angeles River upstream of the northernmost boundary of the City of Vernon and pursuant to Division 22.8 (commencing with Section 32600) of the Public Resources Code in the San Gabriel River and in the lower Los Angeles River watershed.

(History: Added November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 50.)
-------------------------------------------

79509.

Except for projects financed pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 79545) or Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 79570), to be eligible to be financed pursuant to this division, any project that will wholly or partially assist in the fulfillment of one or more of the goals of the CALFED Bay-Delta Program shall be consistent with the CALFED Programmatic Record of Decision, and shall be implemented, to the maximum extent possible, through local and regional programs.

(History: Added November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 50.)
-------------------------------------------

79509.6.

(a) For the purposes of ensuring compliance with Section 79509, the California Bay-Delta Authority shall review regulations, guidelines, or criteria that are proposed by an implementing agency to carry out a grant program for projects and activities that meet the following criteria:

(1) The project is located within the CALFED solution area as defined in the CALFED final programmatic environmental impact statement/environmental impact report, dated July 2000.

(2) The project wholly or partially assists in the fulfillment of one or more of the goals of the CALFED Bay-Delta Program.

(b) Except for projects financed pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 79545) or Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 79570), the California Bay-Delta Authority may review, and comment to the appropriate implementing agency with regard to, a proposal to award a grant pursuant to this division on behalf of a project that meets the criteria set forth in subdivision (a) for the purposes of determining whether or not the project is consistent with the CALFED Programmatic Record of Decision.

(c) To avoid any delays in project awards, the opportunity for review by the California Bay-Delta Authority pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be incorporated into the grant program schedules established by the implementing agencies.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “implementing agency” has the same definition as that set forth in subdivision (h) of Section 79402.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 37.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. The Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Fund of 2002  [79510. - 79512.]

79510.

The Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Fund of 2002 is hereby created.

(History: Added November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 50.)
-------------------------------------------

79511.

All money deposited in the fund shall be used only for the purposes and in the amounts set forth in this division and for no other purpose.

(History: Added November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 50.)
-------------------------------------------

79512.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this division, upon a finding by the agency authorized to administer or expend money appropriated from the fund that a particular project or program for which money has been allocated or granted cannot be completed, or that the amount that was appropriated, allocated, or granted is in excess of the total amount needed, the Legislature may reappropriate the money for other high priority needs consistent with this division.

(History: Added November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 50.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Water Security [79520. - 79522.]

79520.

The sum of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be available for appropriation by the Legislature from the fund for the purpose of protecting state, local, and regional drinking water systems from terrorist attack or deliberate acts of destruction or degradation. This money may be expended or granted for monitoring and early warning systems, fencing, protective structures, contamination treatment facilities, emergency interconnections, communications systems, and other projects designed to prevent damage to water treatment, distribution, and supply facilities, to prevent disruption of drinking water deliveries, and to protect drinking water supplies from intentional contamination.

(History: Added November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 50.)
-------------------------------------------

79521.

The Legislature may enact such legislation as is necessary to implement this chapter.

(History: Added November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 50.)
-------------------------------------------

79522.

(a) Funds made available pursuant to Section 79520 shall be appropriated to the State Department of Public Health to carry out this chapter consistent with the requirements and for the purposes specified in Section 79520.

(b) In the development of priorities for expenditure of the funds appropriated for the purposes of this section, the State Department of Public Health shall consult with the Office of Emergency Services and local water agencies to develop criteria for the department’s programs.

(c) Funds allocated pursuant to this section shall not be available for grants that reimburse project costs incurred prior to the
 adoption of criteria for the grants provided in this section.

(d) No grant funds may be awarded to supplant funding for the routine responsibilities or obligations of any state, local, or regional drinking water system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 534.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Safe Drinking Water [79530. - 79534.]

79530.

(a) The sum of four hundred thirty-five million dollars ($435,000,000) shall be available for appropriation by the Legislature from the fund to the State Department of Health Services for grants and loans for infrastructure improvements and related actions to meet safe drinking water standards including, but not limited to, the following types of projects: 

(1) Grants to small community drinking water systems to upgrade monitoring, treatment, or distribution infrastructure.

(2) Grants to finance development and demonstration of new technologies and related facilities for water contaminant removal and treatment.

(3) Grants for community water quality monitoring facilities and equipment. 

(4) Grants for drinking water source protection. 

(5) Grants for treatment facilities necessary to meet disinfectant by-product safe drinking water standards.

(6) Loans pursuant to the Safe Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Law of 1997 (Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 116760) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code).

(b) Not less than 60 percent of the money appropriated pursuant to this section shall be available for grants to Southern California water agencies to assist in meeting the state’s commitment to reduce Colorado River water use to 4.4 million acre feet per year.

(History: Added November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 50.)
-------------------------------------------

79531.

The Legislature may enact such legislation as is necessary to implement this chapter.

(History: Added November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 50.)
-------------------------------------------

79532.

(a) Funds made available pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 79530 shall be administered in accordance with this section.

(b) (1) Grant funds appropriated for the purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 79530 shall be awarded on a competitive basis.

(2) The department shall consolidate the application process required to implement the grant program described in this section.

(c) For the purposes of this chapter, “southern California water agencies” means water agencies with service areas entirely or partly in one or more of the following counties: San Diego, Imperial, Riverside, Orange, Los Angeles, San Bernardino, Santa Barbara, or Ventura.

(d) Grants may be awarded to southern California water agencies for eligible projects undertaken by one or more southern California water agencies and other entities.

(e) A project funded by a grant made pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 79530 shall meet both of the following requirements:

(1) The project will assist the grantee to meet safe drinking water standards.

(2) The project will assist in meeting the state’s commitment to reduce Colorado River water use to 4.4 million acre-feet per year.

(f) In the development of criteria for the grants awarded pursuant to this section, the State Department of Health Services shall consult with the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment for the purposes of developing a program that gives priority to projects that reduce public and environmental exposure to contaminants that pose the most significant health risks, and that will bring water systems into compliance with safe drinking water standards. These include, but are not limited to, projects that address public exposure to contaminants for which safe drinking water standards have been established, including arsenic, disinfection byproducts and uranium. Projects to address emerging contaminants, including perchlorate, chromium 6, and endocrine disrupters shall also be given priority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 369.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

79534.

(a) Funds made available pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 79530, and not for the purposes of subdivision (b) of that section, shall be administered in accordance with this section.

(b) (1) Grants shall be awarded in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 79530 on a statewide competitive basis.

(2) A project that is eligible for funding for the purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 79530 is not eligible for a grant subject to this section.

(c) For the purposes of this chapter, “small community” means a municipality with a population of 3,300 persons or fewer, or 1,000 connections or fewer.

(d) The State Department of Health Services shall consolidate the application process required to implement the grant program described in this section.

(e) In the development of criteria for the grants awarded under this section, the State Department of Health Services shall consult with the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment for the purpose of developing a program that gives priority to projects that pose the most significant health risks, and that will bring water systems into compliance with safe drinking water standards. These include, but are not limited to, projects that address public exposure to contaminants for which safe drinking water standards have been established, including arsenic, disinfection byproducts and uranium. Projects to address emerging contaminants, including perchlorate, chromium 6, and endocrine disrupters shall also be given priority.

(f) Grants awarded pursuant to this section may not exceed ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for any one project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 240, Sec. 31.   Effective August 13, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Clean Water and Water Quality [79540. - 79544.]

79540.

(a) The sum of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be available for appropriation by the Legislature from the fund to the board for competitive grants for the following purposes:

(1) Water pollution prevention.

(2) Water reclamation.

(3) Water quality improvement.

(4) Water quality blending and exchange projects.

(5) Drinking water source protection projects.

(6) Projects to mitigate pathogen risk from recreational uses at drinking water storage facilities.

(b) Priority shall be given to projects that assist in meeting water quality standards established by the board.
